Florida, session 2026, HB123.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 3 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
76
77 Section 1. Effective December 31, 2026, and
78 notwithstanding ss. 582.31 and 582.32, Florida Statutes, the
79 following soil and water conservation districts are abolished,
80 and all assets and liabilities of each district are transferred
81 to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services:
82 (1) Escambia Soil and Water Conservation District.
83 (2) Yellow River Soil and Water Conservation District.
84 (3) Holmes Creek Soil and Water Conservation District.
85 (4) Orange Hill Soil and Water Conservation District.
86 (5) Chipola River Soil and Water Conservation District.
87 (6) Tupelo Soil and Water Conservation District.
88 (7) Franklin Soil and Water Conservation District.
89 (8) Leon Soil and Water Conservation District.
90 (9) Wakulla Soil and Water Conservation District.
91 (10) Jefferson Soil and Water Conservation District.
92 (11) Hamilton County Soil and Water Conservation District.
93 (12) Dixie Soil and Water Conservation District.
94 (13) Santa Fe Soil and Water Conservation District.
95 (14) Levy Soil and Water Conservation District.
96 (15) Bradford Soil and Water Conservation District.
97 (16) Alachua Soil and Water Conservation District.
98 (17) Nassau Soil and Water Conservation District.
99 (18) Duval Soil and Water Conservation District.
100 (19) Clay Soil and Water Conservation District.
Page 4 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
101 (20) St. Johns Soil and Water Conservation District.
102 (21) Volusia Soil and Water Conservation District.
103 (22) Seminole Soil and Water Conservation District.
104 (23) Orange Soil and Water Conservation District.
105 (24) Hillsborough Soil and Water Conservation District.
106 (25) Manatee River Soil and Water Conservation District.
107 (26) Peace River Soil and Water Conservation District.
108 (27) Sarasota Soil and Water Conservation District.
109 (28) Charlotte Soil and Water Conservation District.
110 (29) Osceola Soil and Water Conservation District.
111 (30) Collier Soil and Water Conservation District.
112 (31) St. Lucie Soil and Water Conservation District.
113 (32) Broward Soil and Water Conservation District.
114 (33) South Dade Soil and Water Conservation District.
115 (34) Hendry Soil and Water Conservation District.
116 (35) Union Soil and Water Conservation District.
117 Section 2. Present subsection (8) of section 171.093,
118 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (9), and a new
119 subsection (8) is added to that section, to read:
120 171.093 Municipal annexation within independent special
121 districts.—
122 (8) Notwithstanding this chapter or any special act to the
123 contrary, a municipality may not elect to assume services of an
124 annexed area which are being provided by an independent special
125 fire control district. Following an annexation pursuant to this
Page 5 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
126 chapter, an independent special fire control district shall
127 remain the service provider in the annexed area, the
128 geographical boundaries of the district must continue to include
129 the annexed area, and the district may continue to levy ad
130 valorem taxes, impact fees, and user fees and assessments on the
131 real property located within the annexed area.
132 Section 3. Paragraph (c) is added to subsection (1) of
133 section 189.03, Florida Statutes, to read:
134 189.03 Statement of legislative purpose and intent;
135 independent special districts.—
136 (1) The Legislature finds that:
137 (c) It is in the public interest for the Legislature to
138 encourage an independent special district to make available to
139 the public suitable district lands and water areas for public
140 outdoor recreational purposes and to limit certain liability of
141 the independent special district resulting from persons
142 accessing such lands and areas and from third persons who may
143 incur damages by the acts or omissions of persons going thereon.
144 Section 4. Section 189.0331, Florida Statutes, is created
145 to read:
146 189.0331 Limitation on liability of independent special
147 district with respect to areas made available to the public for
148 recreational purposes without charge.—
149 (1) As used in this section, the term:
150 (a) "District lands or water areas" includes, but is not
Page 6 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
151 limited to, all district lands, rights-of-way, and water areas
152 that an independent special district controls, possesses, or
153 maintains, or in which the independent special district has a
154 property or other interest, whether in fee simple, easement,
155 leasehold, contract, memorandum of understanding, or otherwise.
156 (b) "Outdoor recreational purposes" includes activities
157 such as, but not limited to, horseback riding, hunting, fishing,
158 bicycling, swimming, boating, camping, picnicking, hiking,
159 pleasure driving, nature study, water skiing, motorcycling, and
160 visiting historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific
161 sites.
162 (2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (5), an
163 independent special district that provides the public with
164 access to district lands or water areas for outdoor recreational
165 purposes, or allows access over or use of district lands or
166 water areas for public outdoor recreational purposes, owes no
167 duty of care to do any of the following:
168 1. Keep the district lands or water areas safe for entry
169 or use by others.
170 2. Warn persons entering or going on such district lands
171 or water areas of any hazardous conditions, structures, or
172 activities thereon.
173 3. Extend any assurance that the district lands or water
174 areas are safe for any purpose solely by allowing access to that
175 district's lands or water areas.
Page 7 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
176 (b) An independent special district does not incur any
177 duty of care toward a person who goes on the district lands or
178 water areas. An independent special district is not responsible
179 for any injury to persons or property caused by an act or
180 omission of a person who goes on such lands or water areas.
181 (c) This section applies to any person going on the
182 district lands or water areas, or lands or water areas subject
183 to a joint use or similar agreement, irrespective of whether the
184 person goes as an invitee, licensee, or trespasser or in any
185 other capacity. However, this subsection does not apply if there
186 is any charge made or usually made for entering or using the
187 district lands or water areas, or if any commercial or other
188 activity from which profit is derived from the patronage of the
189 public, excluding the temporary sale of food, beverages, plants,
190 or T-shirts at temporary special events or nonprofit
191 organizational activities associated with temporary special
192 events, is conducted on any such district lands or water areas,
193 or any part thereof.
194 (3) The protections, immunities, and limitations of
195 liability provided in this section to independent special
196 districts apply regardless of whether any claimant or person was
197 engaged in an outdoor recreational purpose at the time of an
198 accident or occurrence and apply to district lands or water
199 areas used by the public for recreational activities regardless
200 of whether the district lands or water areas were made available
Page 8 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
201 to the public at the time of the accident or occurrence.
202 (4) If an independent special district secures an easement
203 or other right for the purpose of providing access through
204 private land to district lands or water areas that the
205 independent special district provides or makes available to the
206 public for outdoor recreational purposes, the owner of the
207 private land is covered by the liability protection provided in
208 s. 375.251 with regard to the use of such easement by the
209 general public or by employees and agents of the independent
210 special district or other regulatory agencies.
211 (5)(a) This section does not relieve an independent
212 special district of any liability that would otherwise exist for
213 gross negligence or a deliberate, willful, or malicious injury
214 to a person or property.
215 (b) This section does not create or increase the liability
216 of an independent special district or person beyond that which
217 is authorized by s. 768.28.
218 Section 5. Section 189.053, Florida Statutes, is amended
219 to read:
220 189.053 Purchases from purchasing agreements of other
221 governmental entities special districts, municipalities, or
222 counties.—Special districts may purchase commodities and
223 contractual services, other than services the acquisition of
224 which is governed by s. 287.055, from the purchasing agreements
225 of other special districts, municipalities, or counties, or this
Page 9 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
226 state, which have been procured pursuant to competitive bid,
227 requests for proposals, requests for qualifications, competitive
228 selection, or competitive negotiations, and which are otherwise
229 in compliance with general law if the purchasing agreement of
230 the other special district, municipality, or county, or this
231 state was procured by a process that would have met the
232 procurement requirements of the purchasing special district.
233 Section 6. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 189.0695,
234 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
235 189.0695 Independent special districts; performance
236 reviews.—
237 (2)(a) Each independent special district as described in
238 subparagraph (d)1. that is not located in a rural area of
239 opportunity as defined in s. 288.0656(2) and Each independent
240 special district as described in paragraph (c) subparagraph
241 (d)2. must contract with an independent entity to conduct a
242 performance review of the district. The independent entity must
243 have at least 5 years of experience conducting comparable
244 reviews of organizations similar in size and function to the
245 independent special district under review, must conduct the
246 review according to applicable industry best practices, and must
247 have no affiliation with or financial involvement in the
248 reviewed district.
249 (b) The Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
250 Accountability must conduct a performance review of each
Page 10 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
251 independent special district as described in subparagraph (d)1.
252 that is located in a rural area of opportunity as defined in s.
253 288.0656(2) and may contract as needed to complete this
254 requirement.
255 (c) The final report of the performance review must be
256 filed with the governing board of the district, the Auditor
257 General, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
258 House of Representatives no later than 9 months from the
259 beginning of the district's fiscal year according to the
260 schedule provided in paragraph (c) paragraph (d). However, a
261 performance audit of an independent special district conducted
262 by the Auditor General during the same fiscal year in which a
263 performance review is due pursuant to paragraph (c) paragraph
264 (d) qualifies as that district's scheduled performance review
265 under this section.
266 (c)(d)1. Beginning October 1, 2022, and every 5 years
267 thereafter, each independent special fire control district as
268 defined in s. 191.003 must have a performance review conducted.
269 2. Beginning October 1, 2023, and every 5 years
270 thereafter, each hospital licensed under chapter 395 which is
271 governed by the governing body of a special district as defined
272 in s. 189.012 or by the board of trustees of a public health
273 trust created under s. 154.07 must have a performance review
274 conducted.
275 (3) The Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
Page 11 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
276 Accountability must conduct a performance review of all
277 independent special districts classified as safe neighborhood
278 improvement districts as defined in s. 163.503(1), no later than
279 September 30, 2026, within the classifications described in
280 paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) and may contract as needed to
281 complete the requirements of this subsection. The Office of
282 Program Policy Analysis and Government Accountability shall
283 submit the final report of the performance review to the
284 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
285 Representatives as follows:
286 (a) For all independent mosquito control districts as
287 defined in s. 388.011, no later than September 30, 2023.
288 (b) For all soil and water conservation districts as
289 defined in s. 582.01, no later than September 30, 2024.
290 (c) For all safe neighborhood improvement districts as
291 defined in s. 163.503(1), no later than September 30, 2025.
292 Section 7. Section 189.0699, Florida Statutes, is created
293 to read:
294 189.0699 Criminal history record checks for certain
295 independent special district employees and appointees.—
296 (1) Notwithstanding chapter 435, an independent special
297 district, by resolution, may require a state and national
298 criminal history screening for all of the following:
299 (a) Any position of independent special district
300 employment or appointment, whether paid, unpaid, or contractual,
Page 12 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
301 which the governing body of the independent special district
302 finds is critical to security or public safety.
303 (b) Any private contractor, employee of a private
304 contractor, vendor, repair person, or delivery person who is
305 subject to licensing or regulation by the independent special
306 district.
307 (c) Any private contractor, employee of a private
308 contractor, vendor, repair person, for-hire chauffeur, or
309 delivery person who has direct contact with individual members
310 of the public or access to any public facility or publicly
311 operated facility in such a manner or to such an extent that the
312 governing body of the independent special district finds that
313 preventing unsuitable persons from having such contact or access
314 is critical to security or public safety.
315 (2) The resolution must require each person applying for,
316 or continuing employment or appointment in, any such position,
317 applying for initial or continuing licensing or regulation, or
318 having such contact or access to be fingerprinted. The
319 fingerprints shall be submitted to the Department of Law
320 Enforcement for a state criminal history record check and to the
321 Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history
322 record check. The information obtained from the criminal history
323 record checks conducted pursuant to the resolution may be used
324 by the independent special district to determine a person's
325 eligibility for such employment or appointment or to determine a
Page 13 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
326 person's eligibility for continued employment or appointment.
327 This section is not intended to preempt or prevent any other
328 background screening, including, but not limited to, criminal
329 history background checks, which an independent special district
330 may lawfully undertake.
331 Section 8. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
332 582.19, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraphs (c) and (d)
333 are added to that subsection, to read:
334 582.19 Qualifications and tenure of supervisors.—
335 (1) The governing body of the district shall consist of
336 five supervisors, elected as provided in s. 582.18.
337 (a) To qualify to serve on the governing body of a
338 district, a supervisor must be a registered an eligible voter in
339 this state who resides in the district and who meets any of the
340 following criteria:
341 1. Is a landowner of land zoned as agricultural or
342 classified as agricultural lands by the applicable property
343 appraiser;
344 2. Is actively engaged in commercial agriculture
345 production, which for purposes of this section means an
346 individual that produces an agricultural commodity through
347 participation in the day-to-day labor, management, and field
348 operations or that has the legal right to harvest an
349 agricultural commodity;
350 3. Is an actively engaged operator of a farm;
Page 14 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
351 4. Is an owner of or employed by an agriculture business
352 or farm;
353 5. Is an actively engaged agriculture or natural resources
354 professional in a field that is directly related to commercial
355 agriculture or natural resources;
356 6. Is an actively engaged college or university staff
357 member or professor who has expertise in agriculture as defined
358 in s. 570.02;
359 7. Is an actively engaged direct agriculture-related
360 vendor; or
361 8. Has retired from such work or previously owned land as
362 described in subparagraphs 1.-7., provided the person performed
363 such work or owned such land for a minimum of 5 years.
364 (c) Any candidate running to serve as a supervisor
365 pursuant to this section must provide supporting documentation
366 to the supervisor of elections at the time of qualification to
367 verify his or her eligibility to serve pursuant to the criteria
368 listed in paragraph (a). Such proof may include, but need not be
369 limited to, a copy of a property tax bill; a copy of an Internal
370 Revenue Service Schedule F, Profit or Loss From Farming form;
371 proof of employment as a professional in the field of
372 agriculture or natural resources; or a curriculum vitae
373 demonstrating expertise in such topics.
374 (d) The Commission on Ethics shall investigate alleged
375 violations of this section upon receipt of a written complaint
Page 15 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
376 based upon personal knowledge or information other than hearsay
377 and signed under oath or affirmation that a supervisor does not
378 meet the eligibility criteria provided for in this section.
379 1. Is actively engaged in, or retired after 10 years of
380 being engaged in, agriculture as defined in s. 570.02;
381 2. Is employed by an agricultural producer; or
382 3. Owns, leases, or is actively employed on land
383 classified as agricultural under s. 193.461.
384 Section 9. Section 582.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to
385 read:
386 582.20 Powers of districts and supervisors.—A soil and
387 water conservation district organized under the provisions of
388 this chapter shall constitute a governmental subdivision of this
389 state, and a public body corporate and politic, exercising
390 public powers, and such district and the supervisors thereof
391 shall have the following powers, in addition to others granted
392 in other sections of this chapter:
393 (1) To conduct surveys, studies, and research relating to
394 soil and water resources and to publish and disseminate the
395 results of such surveys, studies, research, and related
396 information;
397 (2) To conduct agricultural best management practices
398 demonstration projects and projects for the conservation,
399 protection, and restoration of soil and water resources:
400 (a) Within the district's boundaries;
Page 16 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
401 (b) Within another district's boundaries, subject to the
402 other district's approval;
403 (c) In areas not contained within any district's
404 boundaries on lands owned or controlled by this state or any of
405 its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering
406 and having jurisdiction thereof; or
407 (d) On any other lands within the district's boundaries,
408 within another district's boundaries subject to the other
409 district's approval, or not contained within any district's
410 boundaries upon obtaining the consent of the owner or occupier
411 of the lands or the necessary rights or interests in such lands;
412 (3) To cooperate, or enter into agreements with, any
413 special district, municipality, county, water management
414 district, state or federal agency, governmental or otherwise, or
415 owner or occupier of lands within the district's boundaries,
416 within another district's boundaries subject to the other
417 district's approval, or not contained within any district's
418 boundaries in furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this
419 chapter;
420 (4) To obtain options upon and to acquire, by purchase,
421 exchange, lease, gift, grant, bequest, devise or otherwise, any
422 property, real or personal, or rights or interests therein; to
423 maintain, administer, and improve any properties acquired, to
424 receive income from such properties and to expend such income in
425 carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter; and to
Page 17 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
426 sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any of its property or
427 interests therein in furtherance of the purposes and provisions
428 of this chapter;
429 (5) To make available, on such terms as it shall
430 prescribe, to any owner or occupier of lands within the
431 district's boundaries, within another district's boundaries
432 subject to the other district's approval, or not contained
433 within any district's boundaries agricultural and engineering
434 machinery and equipment, and such other material or equipment,
435 that will assist such landowners and occupiers to carry on
436 operations upon their lands for the conservation and protection
437 of soil and water resources;
438 (6) To construct, improve, operate, and maintain such
439 structures as may be necessary or convenient for the performance
440 of any of the operations authorized in this chapter;
441 (7) To provide, or assist in providing, training and
442 education programs that further the purposes and provisions of
443 this chapter;
444 (8) To sue and be sued in the name of the district; to
445 have a seal, which seal shall be judicially noticed; to have
446 perpetual succession unless terminated as provided in this
447 chapter; to make and execute contracts and other instruments
448 necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers; upon a
449 majority vote of the supervisors of the district, to borrow
450 money and to execute promissory notes and other evidences of
Page 18 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
451 indebtedness in connection therewith, and to pledge, mortgage,
452 and assign the income of the district and its personal property
453 as security therefor, the notes and other evidences of
454 indebtedness to be general obligations only of the district and
455 in no event to constitute an indebtedness for which the faith
456 and credit of the state or any of its revenues are pledged;
457 (9) To use, in coordination with the applicable county or
458 counties, the services of the county agricultural agents and the
459 facilities of their offices, if practicable and feasible. The
460 supervisors may also employ additional permanent and temporary
461 staff, as needed, and determine their qualifications, duties,
462 and compensation. The supervisors may delegate to the chair, to
463 one or more supervisors, or to employees such powers and duties
464 as they may deem proper, consistent with the provisions of this
465 chapter. The supervisors shall furnish to the department, upon
466 request, copies of rules, orders, contracts, forms, and other
467 documents that the district has adopted or used, and any other
468 information concerning the district's activities, that the
469 department may require in the performance of its duties under
470 this chapter;
471 (10) To adopt rules to implement the provisions of this
472 chapter; and
473 (11) To request that the Governor remove a supervisor for
474 neglect of duty or malfeasance in office by adoption of a
475 resolution at a public meeting. If the district believes there
Page 19 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
476 is a need for a review of the request, the district may request
477 that the council, by resolution, review its request to the
478 Governor and provide the Governor with a recommendation.
479
480 Any provision with respect to the acquisition, operation, or
481 disposition of property by public bodies of this state does not
482 apply to a district organized under this chapter unless
483 specifically so stated by the Legislature. The property and
484 property rights of every kind and nature acquired by any
485 district organized under the provisions of this chapter are
486 exempt from state, county, and other taxation.
487 Section 10. Effective upon this act becoming a law, the
488 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall monitor
489 all soil and water conservation districts being abolished in
490 accordance with this act for statutory compliance through the
491 repeal on December 31, 2026, and to ensure that the district is
492 winding up administrative and fiscal matters related to the
493 district in a timely manner while using best practices through
494 the dissolution of the district.
495 Section 11. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
496 made by this act to section 171.093, Florida Statutes, in a
497 reference thereto, subsection (11) of section 189.074, Florida
498 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
499 189.074 Voluntary merger of independent special
500 districts.—Two or more contiguous independent special districts
Page 20 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 123 2026
501 created by special act which have similar functions and elected
502 governing bodies may elect to merge into a single independent
503 district through the act of merging the component independent
504 special districts.
505 (11) EFFECT ON ANNEXATION.—Chapter 171 continues to apply
506 to all annexations by a city within the component independent
507 special districts' boundaries after merger occurs. Any moneys
508 owed to a component independent special district pursuant to s.
509 171.093, or any interlocal service boundary agreement as a
510 result of annexation predating the merger, shall be paid to the
511 merged independent district after merger.
512 Section 12. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
513 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon
514 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1,
515 2026.
Page 21 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb123-00